Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8219.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings of fact.
The general assembly finds and declares that:
(1) This Act ensures that Rhode Island homeowners’ insurance premiums will not be
invested in activities which damage or put at risk their financial, physical, or property interests, or
the integrity of Rhode Island homes, businesses, municipalities, state agencies, or state lands.
(2) Climate change, caused by the combustion of fossil fuels, is an immediate and grave
threat to the people, buildings, infrastructure, environment, natural resources, and economy of the
state.
(3) Rising sea levels and temperatures, extreme weather events, flooding, heat waves,
droughts, and other climate change effects have and, for the foreseeable future, will continue to
damage and destroy homes, businesses, and public infrastructure nationally and within our state,
and, additionally, cause homeowners, businesses, municipalities, and states to continuously take on
additional expenses of remediation, preparation, and insurance against such effects.
(4) In response to climate change impacts, many insurers have raised premiums and
deductibles, reduced coverage, denied more claims, or withdrawn from high-risk areas, shifting
climate risks onto homeowners, renters, and businesses. These changes particularly impact
communities that are already vulnerable to economic instability and natural disasters.
(5) Insurers continue to underwrite and invest in fossil fuel expansion that contributes to

growing climate risks that are burdening consumers and threatening financial markets. Fossil fuel
companies depend on insurance coverage to operate, and insurers remain key financial backers of
new coal, oil, and gas infrastructure. Scientific research indicates that a significant portion of known
fossil fuel reserves must remain unused to limit global warming, and groups like the International
Energy Agency have warned that no new fossil fuel supply projects are compatible with limiting
global warming below 2°C.
(6) This Act will support the State’s goals by limiting the insurance industry’s participation
in fossil fuel industries. The State has committed to reduce climate emissions to net-zero by 2050,
as described in chapter 6.2 of title 42 ("2021 act on climate"). Additionally, this act will further the
State’s goal to incentivize businesses, institutions, and industry to adapt to climate change, as
described in the act on climate.
(7) To make sure households are able to maintain affordable property insurance, insurers
must align their investments and underwriting with science-based emissions targets—meaning they
are in line with what the latest climate science deems necessary to meet the goals of the Paris
Agreement and avoid the worst impacts of climate change.
(8) Insurers should not profit from activities which put their insured at risk of substantial
loss, or which undermine the physical and financial wellbeing of their insured, or otherwise create
or transfer substantial risks or costs to residents, municipalities, state agencies, and state property.
SECTION 2. Title 27 of the General Laws entitled "INSURANCE" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 84
RHODE ISLAND INSURANCE MARKET PROTECTION ACT
27-84-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Insurance Market
Protection Act”.
27-84-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Covered Insurer” means an insurance company authorized to conduct the business of
property and casualty insurance in the State of Rhode Island:
(i) That reports over ten million dollars ($10,000,000) of direct property and casualty
premiums written in the State of Rhode Island on its annual schedule “T” filing with the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners;
(ii) Whose activities or investments may expose such insurer to a heightened level of risk
from the physical or transition effects of climate change; or
LC004953 - Page 2 of 12

(iii) The director otherwise determines that subjecting such an insurer to the requirements
of §§ 27-84-3 and 27-84-4 would be in the public interest.
(2) “Department” means the department of business regulation.
(3) “Director” means the director of the department of business regulation.
(4) “Financed emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions associated with insurer
investments, as defined by the department in consultation with the department of environmental
management. Insurer investments under this definition shall include, at a minimum, investments in
fossil fuel companies and fossil fuel projects. The department may, by rule or guidance, designate
additional asset classes, sectors, or investment types to be included for the purpose of calculating
financed emissions including, but not limited to, high-emitting industries, emissions-intensive
supply chains, and emissions-intensive utilities. In establishing a definition under this subsection,
the department shall consider:
(i) Internationally recognized standards for financed emissions accounting, including those
issued by the Partnership for Carbon Accounting Financials (PCAF);
(ii) The availability and quality of emissions data from subsidiary, joint venture, or
portfolio companies and asset classes;
(iii) The proportional contribution of investment activities to an insurer’s overall
greenhouse gas footprint;
(iv) The need to provide consistent, comparable, verifiable, and transparent emissions
disclosures and disclosure standards across the insurance sector; and
(v) Alignment with Rhode Island climate policy objectives, including emissions reduction
targets, climate risk mitigation strategies, and sector-specific decarbonization targets.
(5) “Fossil fuel” means a carbon-based energy source formed in the earth’s crust from
decayed organic material including, but not limited to, petroleum, crude oil, natural gas, and coal.
(6) “Fossil fuel company” means any entity including, but not limited to, corporations,
limited liability companies, partnerships, joint ventures, trusts, special purpose vehicles, private
equity funds, subsidiaries, associates, affiliates, or any other legal, financial, or organizational
structure that derives ten percent (10%) or more of its revenue from any new or existing fossil fuel
project.
(7) “Fossil fuel project” means a project, undertaking, activity, or investment designed to
facilitate any significant action with respect to fossil fuels or any byproduct thereof for commercial
purposes including, but not limited to:
(i) Upstream activities to include exploration, extraction, drilling, mining, production,
collection, gathering, development, redevelopment, expansion, or construction of mines, fields,
LC004953 - Page 3 of 12

wells, rigs, platforms, or any other related infrastructure;
(ii) Midstream activities to include refining, processing, exportation, transportation,
storage, petrochemical manufacturing, or any other distribution infrastructure or logistics including
construction of pipelines, terminals, power plants, or compressors; and
(iii) Downstream activities to include power, heat, or cooling generation facilities and fossil
fuel-powered manufacturing under North American Industry Classification System (NAICS)
codes: 221112 (Fossil Fuel Electric Power Generation), 325110 (Petrochemical Manufacturing),
and 324199 (All Other Petroleum and Coal Products Manufacturing).
(8) “Insured emissions” means greenhouse gas emissions associated with insurer
underwriting, as defined by the department, in consultation with the department of environmental
management. Insurer underwriting under this definition shall include, at a minimum, underwriting
fossil fuel companies and fossil fuel projects. The department may, by rule or guidance, designate
additional asset classes, sectors, or investment types to be included for the purpose of calculating
insured emissions including, but not limited to, high-emitting industries, emissions-intensive
supply chains, and emissions-intensive utilities. In establishing a definition under this subsection,
the department shall consider:
(i) Methodologies for attributing greenhouse gas emissions to insurance underwriting
activities, including the methodology issued by the Partnership for Carbon Accounting Financials
(PCAF) for insurance-associated emissions, and guidance from international initiatives such as the
Forum for Insurance Transition to Net Zero (FIT) and the Science Based Targets Initiative (SBTi);
(ii) Distinctions among lines of business, including whether the underwriting pertains to
high-emitting sectors such as fossil fuel exploration, extraction, processing, exporting, transporting,
and any other significant action with respect to oil, natural gas, coal, or any byproduct thereof;
(iii) The extent to which emissions attributable to underwriting can be reasonably
measured, estimated, or modeled using available data;
(iv) The need to provide consistent, comparable, verifiable, assured, and transparent
emissions disclosures and disclosure standards across the insurance sector; and
(v) Alignment with Rhode Island climate policy objectives, including emissions reduction
targets, climate risk mitigation strategies, and sector-specific decarbonization targets.
(9) “New fossil fuel project” means a fossil fuel project in excess of what is in or approved
for development as of the effective date of this chapter, including projects designed to expand the
use of or generate new infrastructure for production from existing reserves. A “new fossil fuel
project” shall not include modifications made solely to increase safety or reduce carbon intensity
including, but not limited to, reduce fugitive or vented emissions; provided that, such modifications
LC004953 - Page 4 of 12

do not expand the fossil fuel supply base.
(10) “Science-based climate mitigation targets” means absolute emissions reduction targets
that are in line with limiting global temperature rise to well below 2°C above pre-industrial levels,
as defined by the department, in consultation with the department of environmental management.
In establishing a definition under this subsection, the department shall:
(i) Consider peer-reviewed, science-based methodologies and criteria developed by
recognized and reputable standard-setting bodies, including the Science Based Targets Initiative
(SBTi), the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC), and relevant international
agreements such as the 2015 Paris Climate Accords;
(ii) Cover Scopes 1 (direct), 2 (indirect energy), and 3 (value chain) greenhouse gas
emissions, as defined by the Greenhouse Gas Protocol and consistent with best available accounting
and disclosure practices, to include, the accounting methodologies issued by the Partnership for
Carbon Accounting Financials (PCAF) for financed emissions and insurance-associated emissions;
(iii) Require that targets shall not rely on carbon offsets, avoided emissions claims, or
unproven greenhouse gas removal technologies;
(iv) Align with Rhode Island climate policy objectives, including the mandatory targets for
emissions reduction laid out in chapter 6.2 of title 42 (“2021 act on climate”); and.
(v) Provide for periodic review and updating of targets based on evolving climate science,
sector-specific developments, and real-world performance data.
(11) “State” or “the State” or “this State” means the State of Rhode Island.
27-84-3. Implementing climate leadership targets for Insurers.
(a) The department shall:
(1) On or before July 1, 2027, submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the house and
senate president on the budgetary impacts of this chapter.
(2) On or before January 1, 2028, develop and implement a process for covered insurers to
file reports pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section;
(3) Align covered insurer investment and underwriting activities with science-based
climate mitigation targets, including by:
(i) Prohibiting covered insurers from underwriting any new fossil fuel projects on or after
July 1, 2026;
(ii) Directing covered insurers to unwind and terminate any outstanding or pending
commitments or negotiations to underwrite new fossil fuel projects no later than July 1, 2028.
(iii) Directing covered insurers to phase out all underwriting for any existing fossil fuel
projects and fossil fuel companies by January 1, 2035 and establish short, medium, and long term
LC004953 - Page 5 of 12

benchmarks;
(iv) Prohibiting covered insurers from investing in any new fossil fuel projects on or after
July 1, 2026;
(v) Directing covered insurers to unwind and terminate any outstanding or pending
commitments or negotiations to invest in new fossil fuel projects on or before July 1, 2028;
(vi) Directing covered insurers to phase out all investments from any existing fossil fuel
projects and fossil fuel companies by January 1, 2035 and establish short, medium, and long term
benchmarks; and
(vii) Any other requirements deemed necessary by the department to align covered
insurers’ investments and underwriting with science-based climate mitigation targets, including
developing and implementing enterprise-wide transition plans
(4) On or before January 1, 2028, develop and implement a process for covered insurers to
certify pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, as a condition of licensure in the
State of Rhode Island, that covered insurers meet the requirements of this section, which may
include mandatory transition plans and progress; and
(5) Annually review the reports and certifications required under this section, and compile
and post the information in such reports and certifications on the department’s website within three
(3) months of receiving the same.
(b) On or before July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, covered insurers shall submit, within
six (6) months of the end of each fiscal year, a report to the director disclosing:
(1) The covered insurer’s investments in any fossil fuel company, fossil fuel project, or
new fossil fuel project;
(2) The financed emissions from all of the covered insurer’s investments in the previous
fiscal year;
(3) The covered insurer’s underwriting for any fossil fuel company, fossil fuel project, or
new fossil fuel project, in terms of total gross premiums in dollars, disaggregated by company and
project in a format determined by the director;
(4) The insured emissions from all of the covered insurer’s underwriting in the previous
reporting year;
(5) The timelines, strategies, and methodologies the covered insurer has implemented to
comply with the requirements of this chapter;
(6) The progress the covered insurer has made towards achieving these requirements,
including specific milestones; and
(7) Any other information the department deems necessary to effectively implement and
LC004953 - Page 6 of 12

enforce any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, which the department shall
publish in advance.
(c) As part of the annual report required under subsection (b) of this section, the chief
executive officer (CEO) or chief financial officer (CFO) of a covered insurer shall certify the
accuracy of the information contained in such reports and that the covered insurer has:
(1) Ceased or made progress towards cessation of underwriting and investment in any fossil
fuel project;
(2) Relinquished or made progress in relinquishing any direct or indirect stake in any fossil
fuel company or fossil fuel project; and
(3) Not invested in or underwritten any new fossil fuel project.
(d) The director may engage the services of third-party attorneys, actuaries, accountants,
and other experts not otherwise a part of the director’s staff, at the reporting covered insurer’s
expense, as shall be reasonably necessary to assist in the review of such covered insurer’s filings
under this section. All persons so engaged shall be under the direction and control of the director
and shall act in a purely advisory capacity.
27-84-4. Statewide withdrawal restrictions.
(a) A covered insurer may surrender to the director its certificate of authority and thereafter
cease to transact insurance in the State of Rhode Island, or discontinue the writing or renewal of
one or more individual lines of insurance specified in the certificate of authority in the State of
Rhode Island, only after the submission and approval of an informational filing submitted to the
director, which filing shall be subject to the following provisions:
(1) The covered insurer shall send a notice to policyholders of the proposed withdrawal no
later than thirty (30) days following the submission of the informational filing to the director, which
shall state that the covered insurer intends to withdraw and has filed its intention to withdraw with
the director, the terms of the withdrawal, including the date of the proposed commencement of
nonrenewal of policies, and the proposed duration of the withdrawal plan for the covered insurer’s
book of business;
(2) Nonrenewals shall not commence prior to one calendar year and ninety (90) days
following the submission of the informational filing;
(3) The company shall send a notice of nonrenewal to every policyholder:
(i) No later than one calendar year preceding the date of nonrenewal; and
(ii) A subsequent notice of nonrenewal ninety (90) days preceding the date of nonrenewal;
and
(4) Nonrenewals shall take place in a manner in order to be applicable to all insureds on an
LC004953 - Page 7 of 12

equitable basis with respect to risk classification and territorial or other form of rating factor, and
shall be effectuated at a uniform rate over a period of not less than three (3) calendar years
commencing with the date established in subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(b) Upon receiving the informational filing provided for in subsection (a) of this section,
the director shall:
(1) Within seven (7) days, publish the informational filing on the department’s website;
and
(2) Within thirty (30) days, hold a public hearing, at which the covered insurer and any
members of the public may present testimony to determine if the withdrawal is justifiably required
to protect the solvency of the covered insurer and would not be contrary to the public interest by
disrupting the market or markets for said insurance.
(c) Within sixty (60) days of receiving the informational filing provided for in subsection
(a) of this section, the director shall notify the covered insurer in writing whether the withdrawal
plan has been approved, any conditions of approval, and any requested modifications. If the director
concludes that the withdrawal is not justified to protect the solvency of the covered insurer or would
be contrary to the public interest by disrupting the market or markets for said insurance, the director
shall prohibit the withdrawal unless the covered insurer surrenders all certificates of authority held
by the covered insurer or other companies within the same holding company system as the covered
insurer.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, if the
covered insurer finds a replacement carrier for the business that will not be renewed as the result
of the withdrawal either prior to or after the date of the informational filing, the covered insurer
may apply to the director for approval to transfer the business to a replacement carrier or carriers.
If the director approves the replacement carrier or carriers, notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section, the notice of nonrenewal shall be in compliance with the time limits
provided by law for that line of insurance, and the covered insurer shall offer every insured
coverage with the replacement carrier prior to the effective date of the nonrenewal. The director
shall not withhold approval of a replacement carrier or carriers if that covered insurer is authorized
to do business in the same line of business in Rhode Island and has the financial and business
capability to write and service the business being transferred to it by the withdrawing covered
insurer. The director shall approve or disapprove the replacement carrier or carriers within sixty
(60) days of:
(1) The date of the filing by the withdrawing covered insurer requesting approval of a
replacement carrier or carriers; or
LC004953 - Page 8 of 12

(2) The filing by the replacement carrier or carriers requesting to be a replacement carrier,
whichever is later.
(e) The director may waive the requirements of subsection (a)(2) of this section, and the
one-year nonrenewal notice of subsection (a)(3) of this section, as well as the three (3) year
minimum withdrawal period in subsection (a)(4) of this section if the director deems a waiver to
be necessary to protect the solvency of the covered insurer making the informational filing or if the
director deems the withdrawal to have a limited impact on the market.
27-84-5. Compliance and penalties.
(a) Any covered insurer that fails to comply with the reporting requirements, divestment
obligations or investment and underwriting prohibitions, or withdrawal restrictions under this
chapter shall be subject to, at the discretion of the director, one or more of the following:
(1) Administrative penalties:
(i) Pursuant to § 42-14-16(a); and
(ii) Equivalent to the covered insurer’s fractional share of the property and casualty
insurance market in Rhode Island based on total premiums received multiplied by the insurer’s net
profits generated from the covered insurer’s enterprise-wide operations within Rhode Island in the
violation year, and
(iii) Up to an additional one-tenth of one percent (0.01%) of the violation year’s net profits
generated from the covered insurer’s enterprise-wide operations within Rhode Island per day of a
continuing violation; and
(2) Restriction, suspension, or revocation of the insurer’s certificate of authority to do
business in Rhode Island.
(b) Any covered insurer that fails to comply with the reporting requirements, divestment
obligations or investment and underwriting prohibitions under this chapter shall be required to
report semiannually to the director and submit a compliance plan until the director determines the
covered insurer is in compliance with this chapter.
(c) Any covered insurer that fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter three (3)
times within five (5) years may be subject to additional penalties available to and at the discretion
of the director under Rhode Island insurance laws.
(d) The director may transfer fees collected under this section to other departments or state-
administered funds for the purpose of financing projects and initiatives designed to avoid, limit, or
adapt to negative impacts caused by climate change, including for the benefit of households
residing in and businesses located in low- and moderate- income communities or disadvantaged
communities.
LC004953 - Page 9 of 12

27-84-6. Reporting.
(a) On or before July 1, 2028, and once every two (2) years thereafter, the director shall
submit a report to the governor, speaker of the house and senate president. The report shall also be
made available to the public and posted on the department’s website. The report shall disclose, for
the preceding two (2) calendar years, the department’s:
(1) Efforts to implement the provisions of § 27-84-3, including anonymized and aggregated
data on insurer investments in and underwriting of fossil fuel companies and fossil fuel projects,
financed emissions, and insured emissions;
(2) Regulatory and supervisory actions taken, if any, to bolster the resilience of insurers to
the physical impacts of climate change;
(3) Regulatory and supervisory actions planned, if any, to bolster the resilience of insurers
to the physical impacts of climate change;
(4) Violations of § 27-84-3, and any penalties assessed as a result, anonymized and
aggregated;
(5) Violations of §27-84-4, and any penalties assessed as a result, anonymized and
aggregated; and
(6) The effects, if any, that insurers’ efforts to address climate risk have had on the
affordability and availability of insurance for low income communities, communities of color and
other traditionally underserved communities in the state.
(b) Such report shall also summarize available information regarding:
(1) Insurer and insurance market readiness for climate change and the energy transition;
(2) Major sources of climate risk faced by the insurers;
(3) Any gaps related to climate risk that the department intends to address; and
(4) Any legislative action that must be taken in order to allow the department to address
climate risk.
27-84-7. Rules and regulations.
The department shall adopt such regulations as the director deems necessary to implement
and carry out the purposes of this chapter.
27-84-8. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter, or the application of it to any person or circumstance, is
held invalid, that determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of this chapter which
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of
this chapter are severable.
LC004953 - Page 10 of 12

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004953
========
LC004953 - Page 11 of 12